Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201890-544
Transfer to Water Sustainability Fund.

The State Treasurer shall transfer $11,000,000 from the General Fund to the Water Sustainability Fund on or before June 30, 2016, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.

Laws 2015, LB661, § 3.